Hawaii statutes.
COMMENCEMENT
OF LAND REGISTRATION PROCEDURE

§501-20 Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Apartment lease" means an apartment
or unit lease, a condominium conveyance document, an apartment or unit deed and
ground lease, or other instrument which has been registered pursuant to section
501-121 and which leases or subleases a condominium apartment or unit or its
appurtenant undivided interest in the land of a condominium project established
or existing under chapter 514A or 514B or at common law.

"Date and time of deregistration"
means:

(1) The date and time that a certificate of title for
land, other than a fee time share interest, is recorded in the bureau of
conveyances pursuant to chapter 502 and part II of this chapter;

(2) The date and time, if prior to July 1, 2012, when
a certificate of title for a fee time share interest was recorded in the bureau
of conveyances pursuant to chapter 502 and part II of this chapter, whether
such certificate of title was or is certified by the assistant registrar prior
to, subsequent to, or on July 1, 2012;

(3) July 1, 2012, at 12:01 a.m. for all other fee
time share interests then in existence and for which a certificate of title was
not recorded in the bureau of conveyances pursuant to chapter 502 and part II
of this chapter prior to July 1, 2012; and

(4) For all fee time share interests not yet in
existence as of July 1, 2012, at 12:01 a.m., the date and time of recordation
of the declaration, declaration of annexation, or other document or instrument
establishing such fee time share interest.

"Deregistered land" means:

(1) Land, other than a fee time share interest, that
is the subject of a certificate of title recorded in the bureau of conveyances
pursuant to chapter 502 and part II of this chapter;

(2) A fee time share interest that is the subject of
a certificate of title recorded in the bureau of conveyances pursuant to
chapter 502 and part II of this chapter prior to July 1, 2012, whether the
certificate of title is certified by the assistant registrar on, before, or
after July 1, 2012; and

(3) All other fee time share interests.

"Enter", "entered", or
"entering" means to note the purpose of a filed or recorded document
on the certificate of title.

"Fee time share interest" means a
time share interest, other than a leasehold time share interest, that, at any
time on or after July 1, 2011, consists or consisted of, or includes or
included an undivided interest in registered land, including but not limited to
an undivided interest in one or more fee simple condominium apartments or units
established in whole or in part on registered land.

"File", "filed", or
"filing" means to accept, maintain, and preserve all instruments
required to be filed.

"Leasehold time share interest" means
a time share interest consisting of an undivided interest in an apartment
lease.

"Notice of time share plan" means a
notice of time share plan as that term is defined in chapter 514E.

"Record", "recorded", or
"recording" means to make an entire literal copy of all instruments
required to be recorded.

"Signature" means the name of a
person as written by the individual, the affixing of a mark or finger or toe
print, or electronic signature as that term is defined in chapter 489E.

"State" means the State of Hawaii.

"Time share interest" means a time
share interest as that term is defined in chapter 514E.

"Time share plan" means a time share
plan as that term is defined in chapter 514E. [L 1986, c 246, §1; am L 1995, c
22, §1; am L 1998, c 219, §6; am L 2000, c 178, §1; am L 2008, c 28, §28; am L
2009, c 120, §5; am L 2012, c 121, §2; am L 2013, c 119, §3]

Note

The 2008 amendment is retroactive to July 1, 2006. L 2008, c
28, §43.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next